lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/f.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N
+Pl +Sg +Clt
+Gen +Ine +Ela +Nom +Ess +Par
+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3 
^WG
p2 t2 k2 
e2
^A ^O ^U

LEXICON Root

nouns ;

LEXICON nouns
laiva:laiva m ;
siili m ;
pöytä m ;
nalle:nalle2 m ;
helle:helte2 me ;
liike:liikke2 me ;
koko m ;
tunti m ;
kulta m ;
virta m ;
puhti m ;
ryhti m ;
väri m ;
matto m ;
mato m ;
satu m ;
luku m ;
kipu m ;
liuku m ;
puku m ;
järki:järke m ;
Satu:Sat2u m ;
takki m ;
rako m ;
tapa m ; 
tipu:tip2u m ; 
auto:aut2o m ; 
kuppi m ;
kissa m ;
koira m ;
appelsiini m ;

LEXICON m
+N: sija ;

LEXICON sija
+Sg+Nom: px ;
+Sg+Par:a px ;
+Sg+Gen:^WGn K ;
+Sg+Gen: px2 ;
+Sg+Ine:^WGss^A px ;
+Sg+Ela:^WGst^A px ;
+Sg+Ess:n^A px ;
+Pl+Nom:^WGt K ;
+Pl+Nom: px2 ;

LEXICON me
+N: sijae ;

LEXICON sijae
+Sg+Nom:^WG K ;
+Sg+Nom:e px2 ;
+Sg+Par:^WGtt^A px ;
+Sg+Gen:en K ;
+Sg+Gen:e px2 ;
+Sg+Ine:ess^A px ;
+Sg+Ela:est^A px ;
+Sg+Ess:en^A px ;
+Pl+Nom:et K ;
+Pl+Nom:e px2 ;


LEXICON px
K ;
px2 ;

LEXICON px2
+PxSg1:ni K ;
+PxSg2:si K ;
+PxSg3:ns^A K ;
+PxPl1:mme2 K ;
+PxPl2:nne2 K ;
+PxPl3:ns^A K ;

LEXICON K
# ;
+Clt:%>kin Kkin ;
+Clt:%>k^O Kko ;
+Clt:%>k^A^An Kkaan ;
+Clt:%>h^An Khan ;
+Clt:%>p^A Kpa ;

LEXICON Kkin
# ;
+Clt:%>k^O # ;
+Clt:%>k^A^An # ;
+Clt:%>h^An # ;
+Clt:%>p^A # ;

LEXICON Kko
# ;
+Clt:%>kin # ;
+Clt:%>k^A^An # ;
+Clt:%>h^An # ;
+Clt:%>p^A # ;

LEXICON Kkaan
# ;
+Clt:%>kin # ;
+Clt:%>k^O # ;
+Clt:%>h^An # ;
+Clt:%>p^A # ;

LEXICON Khan
# ;
+Clt:%>kin # ;
+Clt:%>k^O # ;
+Clt:%>k^A^An # ;
+Clt:%>p^A # ;

LEXICON Kpa
# ;
+Clt:%>kin # ;
+Clt:%>k^O # ;
+Clt:%>k^A^An # ;
+Clt:%>h^An # ;
